Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Rights and Obligations

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d Infants §§ 36 to 44; 59 Am. Jur. 2d Parent and Child §§ 9 to 13, 16 to 56, 58 to 87; 62A Am. Jur. 2d Prenatal Injuries; Wrongful Life, Birth, and Conception § 1 et seq.

Constitutionality of gender-based classifications in criminal laws proscribing nonsupport of spouse or child, 14 ALR4th 717.

Sexual child abuser's civil liability to child's parent, 54 ALR4th 93.

Parent's right to recover for loss of consortium in connection with injury to child, 54 ALR4th 112.

Right of child to action against mother for infliction of prenatal injuries, 78 ALR4th 1082.

Prosecution of mother for prenatal substance abuse based on endangerment of or delivery of controlled substance to child, 70 ALR5th 461.

43 C.J.S. Infants §§ 5 to 119.

§ 14-2-201.
Maintenance and education of minor out of income from own property.

Any minor having a living parent and owning property with income sufficient for his maintenance and education in a manner more expensive than his parent can reasonably afford, regard given to the situation of the parent’s family and to all circumstances of the case, the expenses of the minor’s education and maintenance may be defrayed out of the income of the minor’s own property in whole or in part, as judged reasonable and as directed by the court. The charges for maintenance and education may be allowed accordingly in the settlements of the accounts of the minor’s guardian.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 21, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 4876; C.S. 1910, § 5745; C.S. 1920, § 7021; R.S. 1931, § 50-112; C.S. 1945, § 7-111; W.S. 1957, § 14-4; W.S. 1977, §

14-1-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Quoted

in

Bagley v. Bagley, 2013 WY 126, 311 P.3d 141,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Oct 11, 2013).

§ 14-2-202.
Payment or delivery to parent of minor's estate not exceeding $3,000; duty of parent.

Money or other property not exceeding three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) in value belonging to a minor having no guardian of his estate may be paid or delivered to a parent entitled to the custody of the minor to hold for the minor, upon written assurance verified by the oath of the parent that the total estate of the minor does not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) in value. The written receipt of the parent shall be an acquittance of the person making the payment or delivery of money or other property.

It is the duty of the parent to apply the funds received to the use and benefit of the minor.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 28, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-5; Laws 1965, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 14-1-103; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

§ 14-2-203.
Parental tort liability for property damage of certain minors; exception; action cumulative.

Any property owner is entitled to recover damages from the parents of any minor under the age of seventeen (17) years and over the age of ten (10) years who maliciously and willfully damages or destroys his property. The recovery is limited to the actual damages in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) in addition to taxable court costs. This section does not apply to parents whose parental custody and control of the child had been terminated by court order prior to the destructive act.

The action authorized in subsection (a) of this section is in addition to all other actions which the owner is entitled to maintain and nothing in this section precludes recovery in a greater amount from the minor, parents or any person for damages for which the minor or other person would otherwise be liable. The purpose of this section is to authorize recovery from parents in situations where they would not otherwise be liable.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 73, §§ 1-3; W.S. 1957, §§ 14-5.1 to 14-5.3; W.S. 1977, §§ 14-1-104 to 14-1-106; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1991, ch. 65, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sanctions for juvenile offenders, see §

14-6-247

.

Section is constitutional.

Mahaney v. Hunter Enters., 426 P.2d 442,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1967).

Section compatible with supreme court policy. —

Because Wyoming has rejected the “family purpose” doctrine, this section does not fly in the face of the policy set by the supreme court. Mahaney v. Hunter Enters., 426 P.2d 442,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1967).

Father not liable. —

Father not liable for negligence where son took vehicle without knowledge or consent of father and not on mission for father. See Kimble v. Muller, 417 P.2d 178,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1966).

Quoted

in

Campbell v. State, 709 P.2d 425,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 608

(Wyo. 1985); WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For legislative comment, “Parental Tort Liability,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1966).

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutes making parents liable for torts committed by their minor children, 8 ALR3d 612.

Parental liability for injury or damage intentionally inflicted by minor child, 54 ALR3d 974.

Criminal responsibility of parent for act of child, 12 ALR4th 673.

Modern trends as to tort liability of child of tender years, 27 ALR4th 15.

Construction and effect of statutes which make parent, custodian or other person signing minor's application for vehicle operator's license liable for licensee's negligence or willful misconduct, 45 ALR4th 87.

Jurisdiction or power of juvenile court to order parent of juvenile to make restitution for juvenile's offense, 66 ALR4th 985.

§ 14-2-204.
Liability for support; right of action; venue; service; measure of recovery; remedies cumulative; execution; continuing jurisdiction; notice.

Any person legally responsible for the support of a child who abandons, deserts, neglects or unjustifiably fails to support the child is liable for support of the child. It is no defense that the child was not or is not in destitute circumstances. For purposes of this section, a parent’s legal obligation for the support of his or her children, whether natural or adopted, continues past the age of majority in cases where the children are:

Mentally or physically disabled and thereby incapable of self support; or

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 1, § 2.

Between the age of majority and twenty (20) years and attending high school or an equivalent program as full-time participants.

Either of the parents of the child, the department of family services or any other person, agency or institution furnishing the physical care or support of the child may commence civil action for past and future child and medical support.

The petition or complaint shall be filed in the district court of the county where the defendant resides, is found or has assets subject to attachment or execution. Service of process shall be as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

The measure of recovery from the defendant is the reasonable value of the care or support, including medical support furnished to the child by the petitioner and the child support ordered pursuant to W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

and

20-2-311

. In addition, the court may make other suitable order for future care or support of the child. These remedies are cumulative and in addition to other remedies provided by law. Payments of future support shall be paid to the clerk of the district court.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 1, § 2.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 1, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 2285; R.S. 1899, § 3026; C.S. 1910, § 3963; C.S. 1920, § 5028; R.S. 1931, § 20-214; C.S. 1945, § 58-215; Laws 1953, ch. 134, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-18; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-104; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1989, ch. 182, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 197, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 2018 ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (d), substituted “W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

” for “W.S.

20-2-303

through

20-2-305

,

20-2-307

.”

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of judgments, see chapter 17 of title 1.

As to service of process, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Post-majority support.—

In an action regarding post-majority child support, the trial court’s order that the father pay post-majority child support only if the child was enrolled full-time in college was inconsistent with its finding that the child was incapable of self-support because of his phenylketonuria (PKU). Thus, further proceedings were required to determine whether the child’s PKU rendered him mentally or physically disabled and thereby incapable of self-support. O'Roake v. Dep't of Family Servs., Child Support Enf't Div., 2021 WY 98, 494 P.3d 482,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2021).

Amendment applies prospectively. —

The legislature intended for the change in the age of majority made in 1993 to apply prospectively and not to apply to an existing court decree such as a child support order in a divorce decree; the district court erred in modifying the child support orders to reflect the new age of majority. Thomas v. Thomas, 913 P.2d 854,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1996).

Parent has duty to support incapacitated child

even though the child has reached the age of majority. Kamp v. Kamp, 640 P.2d 48,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1982).

Support retroactive to birth. —

District court had statutory authority to award child support retroactively to date of child's birth. Thomas v. Thomas, 983 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1999).

Father owed his children reasonable support from the date of their birth because the statute intended and recognized that child support would be collected retroactively in cases where a parent had abandoned a child and refused to participate in the support of the child. JAG v. State, 2002 WY 158, 56 P.3d 1016,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2002).

Support to end at age of majority. —

Trial court did not err in ordering child support to end when the child became 18 and in having deviated from the presumptive support level; although the parties were not aware of their son's learning disability at the time that the divorce decree, stated support would end once each child reached the age of 18, and the mother had forgiven the child support arrearages owed to her by the father.
Shelhamer v. Shelhamer, 2006 WY 83, 138 P.3d 665,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2006).

Full-time participation in school. —

The trial court did not err in denying father's petition to terminate child support once his daughter reached the age of majority based on his contention that she was not a full-time participant in a high school or its equivalent, where the daughter's absences from school were due to medical conditions and where she took immediate steps to enroll in an alternative school once she was forced to leave high school. Cossette v. Cossette, 2003 WY 107, 76 P.3d 795,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2003).

Statutes permit award to state of child support and other expenses. —

Sections

14-2-101

through

14-2-204

are broad enough to permit an award, on the petition of the state, for child support owing the child's mother and other expenses. Holtz v. State, 847 P.2d 972,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1993).

Disabled and in high school 19-year-old entitled to support. —

As the divorcing parties' 19-year-old daughter was disabled and still attending high school, she was entitled to child support. Bagley v. Bagley, 2013 WY 126, 311 P.3d 141,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2013).

Interest, but not a penalty incurred on child support arrearages.—

Because child
support arrears did not become a judgment by operation of law under
the relevant statute, as the matter was not an action separate from
the parties' divorce proceedings, but was initiated by a mother's
motion to show cause that was filed in the original divorce action,
the mother was not entitled to a 10 percent penalty. However, the
delinquent amounts did bear interest by the relevant statute at a
rate of 10 percent per year from the date of rendition. Rambo v. Rambo, 2017 WY 32, 391 P.3d 1108,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

Campbell v. State, 709 P.2d 425,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 608

(Wyo. 1985); Garver v. Garver, 981 P.2d 471,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1999).

Stated

in

Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974); Glandt v. Taylor, 920 P.2d 647,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948); Heather v. Delta Drilling Co., 533 P.2d 1211,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1975); State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990); In re Adoption of G.A.R., 810 P.2d 113,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1991); Stone v. Stone, 7 P.3d 887,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2000); Jordan v. Brackin, 2003 WY 151, 79 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Status of Legal Abandonment in Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 205.

For article, “Observations and Suggestions Concerning Wyoming Statutes Relating to Adoption Based on Abandonment,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 218.

For note, “Enforcement of Civil Liability for Nonsupport in the State of Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Maintenance of suit by child, independently of statute, against parent for support, 13 ALR2d 1142.

Presumption that child's clothes were furnished by parent, 61 ALR2d 1270.

Trust income or assets as subject to claim against beneficiary for child support, 91 ALR2d 262.

What voluntary acts, other than marriage or entry in military service, terminate parent's obligation to support, 32 ALR3d 1055.

Automobile or motorcycle as necessary for child, 56 ALR3d 1335.

Liability of parent for support of child institutionalized by juvenile court, 59 ALR3d 636.

Parent's obligation to support unmarried minor child who refuses to live with parent, 98 ALR3d 334.

Child's right of action for loss of support, training, parental attention or the like, against a third person negligently injuring parent, 11 ALR4th 549.

Post-secondary education as within nondivorced parent's child-support obligation, 42 ALR4th 819.

Stepparent's postdivorce duty to support stepchild, 44 ALR4th 520.

Postmajority disability as reviving parental duty to support child, 48 ALR4th 919.

Rights and obligations resulting from human artificial insemination, 83 ALR4th 295.

Parent's child support liability as affected by other parent's fraudulent misrepresentation regarding sterility or use of birth control, or refusal to abort pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 337.

Death of obligor parent as affecting decree for support of child, 14 ALR5th 557.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

Validity, construction, and application of Child Support Recovery Act of 1992 (18 U.S.C. § 228), 147 ALR Fed 1.

§ 14-2-205.
Presence of parent, custodian or guardian at hearings; failure to appear; issuance of bench warrant.

It is the responsibility of one (1) or both parents, and the guardian or custodian of an unemancipated minor, if applicable, to appear with the minor before any court of this state in any proceeding in which the minor is required to appear and is alleged to have committed a criminal offense or to have violated a municipal ordinance. It shall be the responsibility of the court to afford any parent, guardian or custodian appearing with a minor pursuant to this subsection a reasonable opportunity to address the court.

In any proceeding in juvenile court, attendance of one or both parents, and the guardian or custodian of the minor, if applicable, shall be compelled as provided by W.S.

14-6-215

.

In a proceeding in a court other than the juvenile court, the presiding judge may require the presence of one or both parents, and the guardian or custodian of the minor, if applicable, at any hearing by causing an order to appear to be served in the manner provided by W.S.

14-6-214

.

Any person served with an order to appear under subsection (c) of this section who without reasonable cause fails to appear, is liable for contempt of court and the court may issue a bench warrant to cause the person to be brought before the court.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 185, § 1.

§ 14-2-206.
Protection of parental rights.

The liberty of a parent to the care, custody and control of their child is a fundamental right that resides first in the parent.

The state, or any agency or political subdivision of the state, shall not infringe the parental right as provided under this section without demonstrating that the interest of the government as applied to the parent or child is a compelling state interest addressed by the least restrictive means.

History.

2017 ch. 188, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 188, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

Due process. —

Due process.—

Applicability.—

Due process. —

Order changing a mother’s permanency plan from family reunification to termination of her rights and adoption was reversed because the record established that the Wyoming Department of Family Services failed to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that it made reasonable efforts to reunify the mother with the children. JR v. State (In the Int. of MA), 2022 WY 29, 505 P.3d 179,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 2

9

(Wyo. 2022); Bd. of Prof'l Resp. v. Tolin, 2022 WY 1, 501 P.3d 1232,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2022).

Due process.—

Supreme court considered a father’s argument that he was deprived of due process in the juvenile proceedings even though it was not raised below because given the close connection between procedures required in the early stages of a child protection action and the cessation of reunification efforts, the issue was of a fundamental nature; however, because the father did not address the issue to the juvenile court, the supreme court’s review was limited to a search for plain error. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Applicability.—

It was not an abuse of discretion to order supervision of a father’s visitation because (1) the father’s statutory right to associate with the children did not apply, (2) the evidence supported findings that the father abused the children, and (3) the evidence supported findings conditioning the father’s unsupervised visitation on the father’s and the children’s therapy. Johnson v. Johnson, 2020 WY 18, 458 P.3d 27,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2020).